Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.405.140

Assistance for teacher may be required after evaluation.

After an evaluation conducted pursuant to RCW 28A.405.100, the principal or the evaluator may require the teacher to take in-service training provided by the district in the area of teaching skills needing improvement, and may require the teacher to have a mentor for purposes of achieving such improvement.

[ 1993 c 336 s 403; 1990 c 33 s 387; 1985 c 420 s 5. Formerly RCW 28A.67.220.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Part headings not law—1993 c 336: See notes following RCW 28A.150.210.

Findings—1993 c 336: See note following RCW 28A.150.210.

Contingency—Effective date—Severability—1985 c 420: See notes following RCW 28A.405.110.